Utah statutes.
59-10-404.   Extension of withholding to payments other than wages.
(1)  For purposes of this part, any supplemental unemployment compensation
benefit paid to an individual, and any payment of an annuity to an individual,
if at the time the payment is made a request that such annuity be subject to
withholding under this part is in effect, shall be treated as if it were a
payment of wages by an employer to an employee for a payroll period.
(2)  For purposes of Subsection (1), "supplemental unemployment compensation
benefits" means amounts that are paid to an employee pursuant to a plan to
which the employer is a party, because of an employee's involuntary separation
from employment, whether or not such separation is temporary, resulting
directly from a reduction in force, the discontinuance of a plant or
operation, or other similar conditions, but only to the extent such benefits
are includable in the employee's gross income.
(3)  For purposes of this part, any unemployment compensation benefit paid to
an individual pursuant to Title 35A, Chapter 4, Employment Security Act, may
be subject to withholding as provided in Section 35A-4-407.
(4)  For purposes of this section, "annuity" means any amount paid to an
individual as a pension or annuity, but only to the extent that the amount is
includable in the gross income of such individual.
(5)  A request that an annuity be subject to withholding under this part shall
be made by the payee in writing to the person making the annuity payments.
The request may be terminated by furnishing to the person making the payments
a written statement of termination which shall be treated as a withholding
exemption certificate for purposes of Section 59-10-403.
